Washington statutes.
RCW 7.28.270

Effect of vacation of judgment.

If the plaintiff has taken possession of the property before the judgment is set aside and a new trial granted, as provided in RCW 7.28.260, such possession shall not be thereby affected in any way; and if judgment be given for defendant in the new trial, he or she shall be entitled to restitution by execution in the same manner as if he or she were plaintiff.

[ 2011 c 336 s 183; Code 1881 s 550; 1877 p 115 s 554; 1869 p 131 s 502; RRS s 807.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. CR 58, 60(e).